Missouri, session 2026, SB1502.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 434, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 434.120, to read as
follows:
434.120. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Missouri Consent and Likeness Protection Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Adhesion contract", any contract, waiver,
release, disclaimer, or terms of entry that is:
(a) Presented on a take-it-or-leave-it basis;
(b) Not subject to meaningful negotiation; or
(c) Required as a condition of entry, participation,
service, or access;
(2) "Disclaimer or waiver", any written, posted,
digital, or verbal statement purporting to limit liability,
obtain consent, or waive legal rights, including, but not
limited to, terms or language provided by any posted sign,
ticket, website, or mobile application, linked by a quick
response code, or by statements asserting consent by
entering, by participating, by remaining on the premises, or
similar conditions;

SB 1502 2
(3) "Identity attributes", an individual's name,
image, photograph, voice, likeness, signature, biometric
identifiers, digital replica, persona, or any substantially
similar identifying characteristics.
3. No adhesion contract, disclaimer or waiver, or
condition of entry shall be valid or enforceable if it:
(1) Waives or limits an individual's right to bring a
civil action for the unauthorized use of the individual's
identity attributes; or
(2) Grants a company or third party the right to use
an individual's identity attributes without allowing the
individual to seek judicial relief.
4. Any provision that purports to release liability,
require arbitration, waive jury trial, limit damages, or
provide consent without reasonable and just compensation
shall be void as against public policy when applied to the
use of identity attributes.
5. For purposes of this section, consent shall not be
implied by:
(1) Entry onto premises;
(2) Presence in a public or quasi-public space;
(3) Participation in an activity;
(4) Purchase of a ticket; or
(5) Failure to read or object to posted terms.
6. Consent for the commercial or promotional use of
identity attributes shall be valid only if the consent is:
(1) Affirmative, explicit, and written;
(2) Negotiated by all parties in good faith;
(3) Separate and distinct from any general terms or
conditions;
(4) Clearly describing:
(a) The specific use of the identity attributes;

SB 1502 3
(b) That the use of the identity attributes is limited
in duration, which shall not to exceed a period of twenty
years;
(c) The parties authorized to use the identity
attributes; and
(d) Whether reasonable and just compensation for the
identity attributes is provided relevant to the negotiated
duration; and
(5) Freely revocable at any time.
7. Consent for the commercial or promotional use of
identity attributes obtained through adhesion contracts or
disclaimers or waivers shall be conclusively presumed
invalid.
8. Any individual whose identity attributes are used
in violation of this section may bring a civil action for
damages in a court of competent jurisdiction. The court may
award a prevailing plaintiff:
(1) Actual damages;
(2) Statutory damages of not less than ten thousand
dollars per violation, with each unauthorized use of an
individual's identity attributes constituting a separate
violation;
(3) Disgorgement of profits;
(4) Injunctive relief;
(5) Declaratory relief; and
(6) Reasonable attorney's fees and costs.
9. Whenever any individual or entity is engaged or
appears to be engaged in any act or practice which is a
violation of this section, the attorney general may:
(1) Investigate possible violations of this section;
(2) Bring an enforcement action to enjoin such act or
practice; and

SB 1502 4
(3) Upon a showing of a violation, seek a civil
penalty of up to twenty-five thousand dollars per violation,
with each unauthorized use of an individual's identity
attributes constituting a separate violation.
10. The rights and requirements established by this
section shall not be waived by contract.
11. This section shall apply to any entity doing
business in this state and to any individual physically
present in this state at the time of the alleged violation.
✓